Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 20 Holidays and Days of Special Observance

16-20-1.
School holidays enumerated.

The first day of January (as New Year’s Day), the third Monday of January (as Martin Luther King, Jr. Day), the twenty-second day of February (as Washington’s Birthday), the thirtieth day of May (as Memorial Day), the fourth day of July (as Independence Day), the twelfth day of October (as Columbus Day), the eleventh day of November (as Veterans Day), the twenty-fifth day of December (as Christmas Day), and each of these days in every year, or when any of the days falls on a Sunday, then the day following it, the first Monday of September (as Labor Day), and any other days that the governor or general assembly of this state or the president or the congress of the United States shall appoint as holidays for any purpose, days of thanksgiving, or days of solemn fast, shall be school holidays and no session of any school, except as provided in this section, in this state shall be held on any one of these days. Independent schools shall not be required to observe as a holiday the third Monday of January (Martin Luther King, Jr. Day).

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1071, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 75, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1223, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-20-1

; P.L. 1980, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 38.

16-20-2.
Special holidays for war effort.

In addition to the holidays in §

16-20-1

, the governor may proclaim school holidays for the purpose of using the school premises and/or personnel in whole or in part for the state and/or federal administration in connection with a war effort, and the days so proclaimed may on specific recommendation of the governor be deducted by the authorities of the several cities and towns from the gross number of school days required by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1223, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-20-2

.

16-20-3.
Days of special observance — Duty of teachers and officials.

The twelfth day of February (as Grand Army Flag Day, in honor of the birthday of Abraham Lincoln), the last Friday in April (as Arbor Day), the fourth day of May (as Rhode Island Independence Day), the thirteenth day of September (as Commodore John Barry Day), and each of these days in every year, or when any of these days shall fall on Saturday then the day preceding, or on Sunday then the day following, shall be especially observed with appropriate exercises in all the schools of this state; and it shall be the duty of teachers and school officers to make suitable provisions for the proper observance of these days.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1071, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 75, § 2; P.L. 1936, ch. 2282, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 1945, ch. 1535, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2453, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-20-3

.

16-20-4.
Grand Army Flag Day — Uniform salute to the flag.

It shall be the duty of the teachers of the public schools to prepare a program of patriotic exercises for the proper observance of Grand Army Flag Day. The department of elementary and secondary education shall prepare for the use of the schools a printed program providing for a uniform salute to the flag, to be used daily during the session of the school. The salute to the flag shall be as follows: “I pledge allegiance to the flag of the United States of America and to the republic for which it stands, one nation, under God, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 818 § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 64, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 66, § 12; P.L. 1932, ch. 1927, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 20, § 1; P.L. 1939, ch. 689, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-20-4

.